Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1547
Member of the Legislature or constitutional officer; multiple filing prohibited; penalty.

Any person serving as a member of the Legislature or in an elective office described in Article IV, section 1, of the Constitution of Nebraska who files for more than one elective office to be filled in the same election except for the position of delegate to a county, state, or national political party convention shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 446.